Utah statutes.
71-10-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Active duty" means active military duty and does not include active duty for training, initial active duty for training, or inactive duty for training.

(2)  "Government entity" means the state, any county, municipality, local district, special service district, or any other political subdivision or administrative unit of the state, including state institutions of education.

(3)  "Preference eligible" means:

(a)  any individual who has served on active duty in the armed forces for more than 180 consecutive days, or was a member of a reserve component who served in a campaign or expedition for which a campaign medal has been authorized and who has been separated under honorable conditions;

(b)  a veteran with a disability, regardless of the percentage of disability;

(c)  the spouse or unmarried widow or widower of a veteran;

(d)  a purple heart recipient; or

(e)  a retired member of the armed forces who retired below the rank of major or its equivalent.

(4)  "Veteran" means:

(a)  an individual who has served on active duty in the armed forces for more than 180 consecutive days, or was a member of a reserve component who served in a campaign or expedition for which a campaign medal has been authorized and who has been separated or retired under honorable conditions; or

(b)  any individual incurring an actual service-related injury or disability in the line of duty whether or not that person completed 180 consecutive days of active duty.

(5)  "Veteran with a disability" means an individual who has:

(a)  been separated or retired from the armed forces under honorable conditions; and

(b)  established the existence of a service-connected disability or is receiving compensation, disability retirement benefits, or pension because of a public statute administered by the federal Department of Veterans Affairs or a military department.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

